Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2010, chapter 389, article 7, section 22, as amended by Laws 2011, chapter 112, article 11, section 16, is amended to read: Sec. 22. CITY OF RAMSEY; TAX INCREMENT FINANCING DISTRICT; SPECIAL RULES. (a) If the city of Ramsey or an authority of the city elects upon the adoption of a tax increment financing plan for a district, the rules under this section apply to a redevelopment tax increment financing district established by the city or an authority of the city. The redevelopment tax increment district includes parcels within the area bounded on the east by Ramsey Boulevard, on the north by Bunker Lake Boulevard as extended west to Llama Street, on the west by Llama Street, and on the south by a line running parallel to and 600 feet south of the southerly right-of-way for U.S. Highway 10, but including Parcels 28-32-25-43-0007 and 28-32-25-34-0002 in their entirety, and excluding the Anoka County Regional Park property in its entirety. A parcel within this area that is included in a tax increment financing district that was certified before the date of enactment of this act may be included in the district created under this act if the initial district is decertified. (b) The requirements for qualifying a redevelopment tax increment district under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.174, subdivision 10, do not apply to the parcels located within the district. (c) Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4j, does not apply to the district. Eligible expenditures within the district include but are not limited to (1) the city's share of the costs necessary to provide for the construction of the Northstar Transit Station and related infrastructure, including structured parking, a pedestrian overpass, and roadway improvements, (2) the cost of land acquired by the city or the housing and redevelopment authority in and for the city of Ramsey within the district prior to the establishment of the district, and (3) the cost of public improvements installed within the tax increment financing district prior to the establishment of the district. (d) The requirement of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 3, that activities must be undertaken within a five-year period from the date of certification of a tax increment financing district, is considered to be met for the district if the activities were undertaken within ten years from the date of certification of the district. (e) Except for administrative expenses, the in-district percentage for purposes of the restriction on pooling under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 2, for this district is 100 percent. (f) The requirement of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.177, subdivision 4, does not apply to Parcels 28-32-25-42-0021 and 28-32-25-41-0014, where development occurred after enactment of Laws 2010, chapter 389, article 7, section 22, and prior to adoption of the tax increment financing plan for the district. new text begin (g) The requirement of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.178, subdivision 7, paragraph (b), is considered to be met for the district if the city adopts interfund loan resolutions reflecting the terms and conditions required by Minnesota Statutes, section 469.178, subdivision 7, paragraph (d), by December 31, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the city of Ramsey and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end